Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-156
Additional court cost; indigent defense fee.

(1) In addition to all other court costs assessed according to law, an indigent defense fee of three dollars shall be taxed as costs for each case filed in each county court and district court, including appeals to such courts, and for each appeal and original action filed in the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court. The fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the end of the month. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees to the Commission on Public Advocacy Operations Cash Fund.

(2) In cases under the DNA Testing Act, costs shall be paid as provided in such act.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 108, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1085, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 659, § 18;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 67;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 29-3931;

Laws 2003, LB 760, § 12;

Laws 2005, LB 348, § 17.

DNA Testing Act, see section 29-4116.